Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 3 Division of Personnel Administration

36-3-1.
Short title.

Chapters 3 and 4 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the “State Merit System Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-1

.

36-3-2.
Purpose of chapters 3 and 4 of this title.

Whereas the legislature in the January 1951 session established a department of administration and in article II thereof created a “merit system of personnel administration” and a division of personnel administration within the department, it is apparent the intent was to establish an organization which would be more effective in securing qualified personnel for the classified service of the state than had been the case under the civil service department as created in chapter 661 of the Public Laws of 1939. To further clarify that intent and to provide for its accomplishment, there is proposed a restatement of chapter 661 and certain amendments thereto with proposed changes which will provide the authority necessary to attain the desired objectives.

The purpose of this chapter and chapter 4 of this title is to guarantee to all citizens a fair and reasonable opportunity for public service, to establish conditions of service which will attract officers and employees of character and capacity, and to increase the efficiency of the governmental departments and agencies by the improvement of methods of personnel administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, Preamble, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-2

.

36-3-3.
Definitions.

The following terms, when used in this chapter and chapter 4 of this title, shall have the following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Appointing authority” means the person or group of persons having the power by virtue of the constitution, a state statute, or lawfully delegated authority to make appointments.

“Appropriate list” means any employment list, promotion list, or employment list which is declared appropriate by the personnel administrator for purposes of certification and appointment.

“Classified employee” means any person holding a position in the classified service.

“Classified service” means all offices and positions of trust or employment in the state service except those placed in the unclassified service by chapter 4 of this title or any other legislation.

“Department” means the department of administration.

“Director” means the director of the department of administration.

“Disabled veteran” means any war veteran who is an examinee and who is certified by the veterans administration to be physically disabled, as a result of a service connected disability, with a disability rating of zero percent (0%) or more.

“Division” means the division of personnel administration.

“Employee” means any person holding a position subject to appointment by an appointing authority.

“Employment list” means a list of names of persons arranged in the order of their ratings who have been found qualified through suitable tests, and who are entitled to have their names certified to appointing authorities for original appointment under the provisions of chapter 4 of this title and rules.

“Personnel administration” means the legal framework of the state government personnel system, i.e., statutes, rules, and policies.

“Personnel administrator” means the head of the division.

“Personnel management” means the powers and duties of the personnel administrator as set forth in this chapter and chapter 4 of this title.

“Position” means any office or place of employment in the state service.

“Promotion list” means a list of names of classified employees arranged in order of their ratings, who have been found qualified through suitable tests for promotion to positions in other classes under the provisions of chapter 4 of this title and rules.

“Provisional status” means:

the status of an appointee who has completed one year of service in a position for which no suitable list has been established; or

the status of an appointee on leave from a position in which he or she holds permanent status to accept a higher position for which no suitable list has been established.

“Public hearing” means an opportunity given after public notice of at least five (5) calendar days for any citizen or party to appear and be heard on the matter involved.

“Reemployment list” means a list of names of persons who have occupied positions in the classified service, who have been separated from a position in the classified service, and who are entitled to have their names certified to appointing authorities under the provisions of chapter 4 of this title and rules.

“State service” means all offices and positions of trust or employment in the service of the state.

“Temporary status” means the status of an appointee who has not acquired provisional, probationary, or permanent status in the position held.

“War veteran” or “veteran” means any person, male or female, who was employed as an officer, member of the enlisted personnel or otherwise in the active military or naval service of the United States or of any auxiliary unit of the military or naval service, except civilian employees, during the Spanish American War, the Philippine Insurrection, the China Relief Expedition or at some time during the period between April 6, 1917, and November 11, 1918, or the period between December 7, 1941, and December 31, 1946, or who was engaged in the active conduct of and/or fighting in the Korean campaign (active conduct of and/or fighting in the Korean Campaign, shall mean service by any man or woman of the armed forces of the United States between June 27, 1950, and January 31, 1955), or the conflict in Vietnam (active conduct of and/or fighting in the conflict in Vietnam shall mean service by any man or woman of the armed forces of the United States between August 5, 1964, and May 7, 1975), and who served for at least six (6) months and one day; provided, however, that the definition shall not include any person who has been separated from employment of service, except through honorable discharge, if the reason for the separation shall be deemed by the personnel administrator to be sufficient cause to deny inclusion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 3; P.L. 1943, ch. 1307, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 3; P.L. 1953, ch. 3178, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 87.

36-3-4.
Division established — Administrator.

There is hereby established within the department of administration a division of personnel administration. The head of this division shall be known as the personnel administrator who shall be in the classified service and whose salary shall be established in accordance with the terms of the pay plan for classified employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-4

.

36-3-5.
Powers and duties of the administrator.

In addition to the duties imposed upon the personnel administrator elsewhere in the law and the personnel rules, it shall be the duty of the personnel administrator:

As executive head of the division of personnel administration, to direct, supervise, develop, and authorize all personnel-related administrative and technical activities including personnel administration and personnel management.

To prepare and recommend to the director of administration those rules as are deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of the law.

To supervise the operation of the classification plan and to recommend to the director amendments and additions thereto.

To supervise the operation of the pay plan and to recommend to the director amendments and additions thereto.

To establish and supervise the maintenance of employment lists, promotion lists, and reemployment lists; to develop recruitment procedures, monitor agency recruitment processes for compliance with the statutes and policies, and make available to state agencies qualified candidates as vacancies occur; direct and supervise equal opportunity programs; manage employee benefit plans, including the coordination of health insurance, prescription/vision care, group life insurance, dental care, prepaid legal services, deferred compensation and cancer programs, and any other programs established by the legislature related to employee benefits; and to manage career awards programs and state and local enforcement firefighters incentive training programs.

To perform any other lawful act which he or she may consider necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, and chapter 4 of this title, and the rules and to conduct innovative demonstration projects to improve state personnel management.

To facilitate and/or coordinate state and national background checks for applicants and/or employees in state positions with access to federal tax information, as defined in §

36-3-16(a)(6)

.

The personnel administrator is authorized and empowered to revise state job descriptions to ensure the use of appropriate disability language as required by §

43-3-7.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 6; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-5

; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 40, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 53, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 5; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 18.

36-3-6.
Personnel appeal board — Appointment and terms of members.

There is hereby established a personnel appeal board to consist of five (5) qualified electors who shall be known to be in sympathy with the application of modern personnel practices, under a merit system of personnel administration, in the public service and not more than three (3) of whom shall be members of the same political party. In the month of March in each odd numbered year, the governor, with the consent of the senate, shall appoint members of the personnel appeal board to succeed the members whose term will next expire. Each member of the board so appointed shall hold office until the first day of April in the sixth year following his or her appointment and until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. A vacancy, whatever the circumstances of its creation, shall be filled by appointment of the governor with the consent of the senate within sixty (60) days and only for the unexpired portion of the term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-6

; P.L. 1986, ch. 434, § 1.

36-3-7.
Appointment of minority members of board.

The governor shall submit the name of the two (2) members of the board whom he or she desires to appoint and who are not of the same political party as the governor to the chairperson of the state central committee of the party of which that person is a member for the approval of the chairperson. If the chairperson shall disapprove the names submitted to him or her, the governor shall submit another name, and so on in like manner until approval is obtained; provided, however, that if no disapproval is made within five (5) days from the submission of a name by the governor, the name of the person to be appointed shall be deemed to have been approved. Thereafter, if an appointment is to be made to the board of a member who is not of the same political party as the governor, the appointment shall be made as above provided.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-7

; P.L. 1986, ch. 434, § 1.

36-3-8.
Organization and meetings of board — Compensation of members.

The board shall elect one of its members chairperson. Each member shall take the oath of office before entering upon the duties of the office. Members of the board shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and other expenses and each member of the board shall be paid an annual salary of seven thousand two hundred dollars ($7,200). The board shall meet at times and places as shall be specified by call of the chairperson or the governor. Notice of each meeting shall be given in writing to each member. Three (3) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-8

; P.L. 1978, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 434, § 1.

36-3-9.
Removal of board members.

A member of the board shall be removable by the governor for cause after being given a copy of charges against him or her and an opportunity to be heard publicly on the charge before the governor. A copy of the charges and a transcript of the board shall be filed with the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-9

.

36-3-10.
Appeals to appeal board.

The personnel appeal board shall hear appeals:

By any person with provisional, probationary, or permanent status in a position in the classified service aggrieved by an action of the administrator of adjudication for the department of administration on matters of personnel administration.

By any person with provisional, probationary, or permanent status in a position in the classified service who has been discharged, demoted, suspended, or laid off by any appointing authority.

By any person who holds the belief that he or she has been discriminated against because of his or her race, sex, age, disability, or his or her political or religious beliefs in any personnel action.

By any person who by the personnel policy of the state of Rhode Island or by contractual agreement with the state of Rhode Island is vested with the right of appeal to the board.

Appeals shall be taken in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 4 of this title of the personnel rules provided, however, that the personnel appeal board may dismiss the appeal of a person who has already appealed or seeks to appeal the same matter under provisions of a contractual agreement or other law or regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 3; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-10

; P.L. 1961, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 2; P.L. 1977, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 212, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 9.

36-3-10.1.
Powers of subpoena.

The appeal board is hereby authorized to require the attendance of witnesses by subpoena and to acquire the production of books, papers, and documents at any hearing pursuant to §

36-3-10

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 139, § 1.

36-3-11.
Statutory references to previous agencies and officials.

Wherever in any general or public law the words “civil service commission” appear or are implied, there shall be substituted therefor the words “director of administration”, except that wherever the words “civil service commission” appear in relation to the rights of any person to appeal against an action of an appointing authority resulting in a dismissal, demotion, discrimination because of race, sex, age, disability, or political or religious beliefs, suspension or layoff, the words “personnel appeal board” shall be substituted.

Wherever in any general or public law the words “director of civil service” appear or are implied there shall be substituted therefor the words, “personnel administrator”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 2, § 4; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-11

; P.L. 1977, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 9.

36-3-12.
Services to cities and towns.

The services and facilities of the personnel division and its staff shall be available upon request, subject to personnel rules prescribed therefor, to the cities and towns of the state. In making its services and facilities available, it shall be understood that requirements for the enforcement and administration of the provisions of this chapter and chapter 4 of this title shall be given precedence and that the local governmental subdivisions shall reimburse the state for the reasonable cost of the service and facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 24; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-12

.

36-3-13.
Cooperation with agencies of other jurisdictions.

The personnel administrator may enter into arrangements with personnel agencies in other jurisdictions for the purpose of exchanging services and effecting transfers of employees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 24; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-13

.

36-3-14.
Facilities for division.

The division shall be provided by the director with the necessary funds and employees to enable the division to examine temporary employees within the time prescribed by law and with suitable offices, examination rooms, and accommodations for itself and staff in the city of Providence, and in localities throughout the state as may be required to suit the public convenience and carry on the work of the division. It shall be the duty of the officers of the state, or any political subdivisions thereof, at any place where examinations or hearings are directed to be held by the personnel administrator to allow the reasonable use of public buildings and rooms and to furnish the buildings and rooms with heat and light for holding hearings and examinations and in all proper ways to facilitate the work of the division in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 4 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 26; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-14

; P.L. 1962, ch. 197, § 2.

36-3-15.
Legal assistance to division.

The attorney general shall advise and assist the division and shall prosecute violations of all laws relating to the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 26; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

36-3-15

.

36-3-16.
Authority to conduct state and national background checks for applicants and employees in state positions with access to federal tax information.

Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms are hereby defined as follows:

“Access,” shall mean the direct use, contact, handling or viewing of federal tax information, as defined herein, in paper or electronic form, regardless of the frequency, likelihood or extent of such access.

“Agency” or “state agency,” shall mean a Rhode Island state agency within the executive branch.

“Agency head,” shall mean the director or designee of a state agency holding the position with access (as defined herein).

“Applicant for employment,” shall mean an individual who has applied for or may be offered employment, transfer or promotional opportunities with a state agency, including employment as a full-time or part-time employee, intern, temporary or seasonal employee, or volunteer, in a position with access (as defined herein).

“Current agency employee,” shall mean a full-time or part-time state employee, intern, temporary or seasonal employee or volunteer in a position with access (as defined herein).

“Federal tax information” or “FTI” shall mean:

Federal tax returns or information created or derived from federal tax returns that is in an agency’s possession or control, which is covered by the confidentiality protections of the Internal Revenue Code and subject to 26 U.S.C. § 6103(p)(4) safeguarding requirements, including oversight by the Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”); and received directly from the IRS or obtained through an authorized secondary source, such as the Social Security Administration (SSA), Federal Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE), Bureau of the Fiscal Service (BFS), Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS), or another entity acting on behalf of the IRS pursuant to an Internal Revenue Code (“IRC”) 6103(p)(2)(B) agreement; and

FTI shall expressly not include federal tax returns or information created or derived from federal tax returns received from taxpayers or other third-parties.

“Law enforcement authorized agency” shall mean a government entity authorized to conduct national background checks using the federal bureau of investigation’s fingerprinting national background check system.

The personnel administrator or designee shall require to be obtained a state and national fingerprint-based criminal background check initially and at least every ten years, as authorized by Public Law 92-544, to determine the suitability of an applicant for employment prior to hiring or a current agency employee, if the position applied for or held requires or includes access to FTI.

An applicant for employment or current agency employee who refuses to comply with the fingerprint-based background check requirements shall be considered unsuitable for serving in a position requiring or involving, or which may require or involve, access to FTI.

The national fingerprint-based criminal background check shall be facilitated through the office of the attorney general or another law enforcement authorized agency and forwarded to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history check, according to the policies, procedures, and/or regulations established by the office of the attorney general or another law enforcement authorized agency.

For current agency employees, the agency shall pay the applicable fee charged through the office attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency to conduct state and national background checks. However, applicants for employment shall be required to pay the fee charged through the office attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency.

Fingerprint submissions may be retained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency to assist the personnel administrator authorized pursuant to this section to ensure the continued suitability of an applicant for employment or a current agency employee for access to FTI.

The office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency may disseminate the results of the state and national criminal background checks to the personnel administrator or designee of the personnel administrator.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, solely for the purposes of this chapter, the personnel administrator, agency head and authorized staff of an agency may receive criminal offender record information to the extent required by federal law and the results of checks of national criminal history information databases under Public Law 92-544.

Upon receipt of the results of state and national criminal background checks, the personnel administrator, agency head and other authorized staff shall treat the information as non-public and exempt from disclosure in accordance with the Rhode Island access to public records act, § 38-2-2(4)(A)(I)(b). Information acquired by any agency in the background check process pursuant to this section shall be used solely for the purposes of making a determination as to the suitability of a particular current employee or applicant for employment for and assignment to duties in a position that requires or includes, or may require or include, access to FTI.

If the office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency receives criminal record information from the state or national fingerprint-based criminal background checks that includes no disposition or is otherwise incomplete, the office of the attorney general or other law enforcement authorized agency shall notify the personnel administrator and the subject person. The applicant for employment or the current agency employee shall be responsible for resolving any issues in other jurisdictions causing an incomplete background check. Within fifteen (15) business days from being notified, the applicant for employment or current agency employee must resolve any incomplete background check. For the purposes of this chapter, the personnel administrator, in his or her sole discretion, may extend the amount of time to resolve an incomplete report. Once resolved, the applicant’s suitability for employment in a position requiring or involving, or which may require or involve, access to FTI shall be determined in accordance with subsection (f).

In the event that an applicant for employment fails to resolve an issue with an incomplete background check by the deadline stated herein, the person shall no longer be considered for employment to the position with access.

In the event that a current agency employee fails to resolve an issue with an incomplete background check by the deadline provided herein, along with any extension, the employee may be terminated or discharged from employment; provided, however, that a current agency employee may be placed on administrative leave or reassigned to a position that does not require access to FTI if that position is available and subject to the business needs of the agency at the discretion of the personnel administrator and agency head. Any such employment action shall be subject to the same appeal or grievance procedures as normally authorized.

The personnel administrator or designee shall review the results to determine the suitability of the applicant for employment or current agency employee, based on criteria established through regulation, to serve in a position requiring or involving, or which may require or involve, access to FTI. In making such a determination of suitability, the personnel administrator or designee may consult with the agency head and consider mitigating factors relevant to the current agency employee’s employment and the nature of any disqualifying offense.

In the event that an applicant for employment receives a final determination that the person is unsuitable, the person shall no longer be considered for employment into a position with access.

A current employee may appeal a determination of unsuitability to the personnel administrator. While the appeal is pending, the employee may be placed on administrative leave in the discretion of the personnel administrator. A final determination of unsuitability after appeal may result in termination or discharge from employment; provided, however, that subject to the discretion of the personnel administrator and the agency head, a current agency employee may be reassigned to a position that does not require access to FTI if that position is available and subject to the business needs of the agency. Any such employment action shall be subject to further appeal or grievance procedures as normally authorized.

Nothing in this section shall limit or preclude an agency’s right to carry on a background investigation of an applicant for employment or a current agency employee using other authorized means.

The Department of Administration is hereby authorized to promulgate and adopt regulations necessary to carry out this section.

The judicial branch is hereby authorized to comply with the provisions herein related to employees with access to FTI.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 6.